Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2350
Ademption by satisfaction.

Property which a testator gave in his lifetime to a person is treated as a satisfaction of a devise to that person in whole or in part only if the will provides for deduction of the lifetime gift, or the testator declares in a writing contemporaneous with the gift that it is to be deducted from the devise or is in satisfaction of the devise, or the devisee acknowledges in a writing contemporaneous with the gift that it is in satisfaction. For purpose of partial satisfaction, property given during lifetime is valued as of the time the devisee came into possession or enjoyment of the property or as of the time of death of the testator, whichever occurs first.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 72, UPC § 2-612.

Ademption by satisfaction is provided only for the devisees of a will, and if a devise is made by a will to a trust or trustee, the trust or trustee is the devisee and the beneficiaries of the trust are not devisees and ademption does not apply. In re Estate of Radford, 304 Neb. 205, 933 N.W.2d 595 (2019).

A donor may express in the gift that the gift is an advancement. In re Estate of McFayden, 235 Neb. 214, 454 N.W.2d 676 (1990).

This section does not permit the use of parol evidence to prove that a testator or testatrix intended an inter vivos gift to be an advancement toward, or ademptive of, a devise in the testator's or testatrix's will. In re Estate of McFayden, 235 Neb. 214, 454 N.W.2d 676 (1990).

This section eliminates as proof a written blanket declaration that future inter vivos gifts to a devisee are to be considered advancements. In re Estate of McFayden, 235 Neb. 214, 454 N.W.2d 676 (1990).